Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Article 1. Oil and Gas Production Tax.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor's transmittal letter for
ch. 10, SLA 2013 (SB 21), see 2013 Senate Journal 33 — 36.

Sec. 43.55.010.
Gross production tax. [Repealed, § 9 ch 136 SLA 1977.]

Sec. 43.55.011.
Oil and gas production tax.

[Repealed, § 34 ch 2 TSSLA 2006.]

[Repealed, § 34 ch 2 TSSLA 2006.]

[Repealed, § 34 ch 2 TSSLA 2006.]

[Repealed, § 18 ch 116 SLA 1981.]

There is levied on the producer of oil or gas a tax for all oil and gas produced each calendar year from each lease or property in the state, less any oil and gas the ownership or right to which is exempt from taxation or constitutes a landowner’s royalty interest or for which a tax is levied by AS

43.55.014

. Except as otherwise provided under (f), (j), (k), (o), and (p) of this section, for oil and gas produced

before January 1, 2014, the tax is equal to the sum of

the annual production tax value of the taxable oil and gas as calculated under AS

43.55.160(a)(1)

multiplied by 25 percent; and

the sum, over all months of the calendar year, of the tax amounts determined under (g) of this section;

on and after January 1, 2014, and before January 1, 2022, the tax is equal to the annual production tax value of the taxable oil and gas as calculated under AS

43.55.160(a)(1)

multiplied by 35 percent;

on and after January 1, 2022, the tax for

oil is equal to the annual production tax value of the taxable oil as calculated under AS

43.55.160(h)

multiplied by 35 percent;

gas is equal to 13 percent of the gross value at the point of production of the taxable gas; if the gross value at the point of production of gas produced from a lease or property is less than zero, that gross value at the point of production is considered zero for purposes of this subparagraph.

The levy of tax under (e) of this section for

oil and gas produced before January 1, 2022, from leases or properties that include land north of 68 degrees North latitude, other than gas subject to (o) of this section, may not be less than

four percent of the gross value at the point of production when the average price per barrel for Alaska North Slope crude oil for sale on the United States West Coast during the calendar year for which the tax is due is more than $25;

three percent of the gross value at the point of production when the average price per barrel for Alaska North Slope crude oil for sale on the United States West Coast during the calendar year for which the tax is due is over $20 but not over $25;

two percent of the gross value at the point of production when the average price per barrel for Alaska North Slope crude oil for sale on the United States West Coast during the calendar year for which the tax is due is over $17.50 but not over $20;

one percent of the gross value at the point of production when the average price per barrel for Alaska North Slope crude oil for sale on the United States West Coast during the calendar year for which the tax is due is over $15 but not over $17.50; or

zero percent of the gross value at the point of production when the average price per barrel for Alaska North Slope crude oil for sale on the United States West Coast during the calendar year for which the tax is due is $15 or less; and

oil produced on and after January 1, 2022, from leases or properties that include land north of 68 degrees North latitude, may not be less than

four percent of the gross value at the point of production when the average price per barrel for Alaska North Slope crude oil for sale on the United States West Coast during the calendar year for which the tax is due is more than $25;

three percent of the gross value at the point of production when the average price per barrel for Alaska North Slope crude oil for sale on the United States West Coast during the calendar year for which the tax is due is over $20 but not over $25;

two percent of the gross value at the point of production when the average price per barrel for Alaska North Slope crude oil for sale on the United States West Coast during the calendar year for which the tax is due is over $17.50 but not over $20;

one percent of the gross value at the point of production when the average price per barrel for Alaska North Slope crude oil for sale on the United States West Coast during the calendar year for which the tax is due is over $15 but not over $17.50; or

zero percent of the gross value at the point of production when the average price per barrel for Alaska North Slope crude oil for sale on the United States West Coast during the calendar year for which the tax is due is $15 or less.

For each month of a calendar year before 2014 for which the producer’s average monthly production tax value under AS

43.55.160(a)(2)

of a BTU equivalent barrel of the taxable oil and gas is more than $30, the amount of tax for purposes of (e)(1)(B) of this section is determined by multiplying the monthly production tax value of the taxable oil and gas produced during the month by the tax rate calculated as follows:

if the producer’s average monthly production tax value of a BTU equivalent barrel of the taxable oil and gas for the month is not more than $92.50, the tax rate is 0.4 percent multiplied by the number that represents the difference between that average monthly production tax value of a BTU equivalent barrel and $30; or

if the producer’s average monthly production tax value of a BTU equivalent barrel of the taxable oil and gas for the month is more than $92.50, the tax rate is the sum of 25 percent and the product of 0.1 percent multiplied by the number that represents the difference between the average monthly production tax value of a BTU equivalent barrel and $92.50, except that the sum determined under this paragraph may not exceed 50 percent.

[Repealed, § 66 ch 1 SSSLA 2007.]

There is levied on the producer of oil or gas a tax for all oil and gas produced each calendar year from each lease or property in the state the ownership or right to which constitutes a landowner’s royalty interest, except for oil and gas the ownership or right to which is exempt from taxation. The provisions of this subsection apply to a landowner’s royalty interest as follows:

the tax levied for oil is equal to five percent of the gross value at the point of production of the oil;

the tax levied for gas is equal to 1.667 percent of the gross value at the point of production of the gas;

if the department determines that, for purposes of reducing the producer’s tax liability under (1) or (2) of this subsection, the producer has received or will receive consideration from the royalty owner offsetting all or a part of the producer’s royalty obligation, other than a deduction under AS

43.55.020

related to a settlement with a royalty owner of the amount of a tax paid, then, notwithstanding (1) and (2) of this subsection, the tax is equal to 25 percent of the gross value at the point of production of the oil and gas.

For a calendar year, the tax levied by (e) of this section for gas produced from a lease or property in the Cook Inlet sedimentary basin may not exceed

for a lease or property that first commenced commercial production of gas before April 1, 2006, the product obtained by multiplying (A) the amount of taxable gas produced during the calendar year from the lease or property, times (B) the average rate of tax that was imposed under this chapter for taxable gas produced from the lease or property for the 12-month period ending on March 31, 2006, times (C) the quotient obtained by dividing the total gross value at the point of production of the taxable gas produced from the lease or property during the 12-month period ending on March 31, 2006, by the total amount of that gas;

for a lease or property that first commences commercial production of gas after March 31, 2006, the product obtained by multiplying (A) the amount of taxable gas produced during the calendar year from the lease or property, times (B) the average rate of tax that was imposed under this chapter for taxable gas produced from all leases or properties in the Cook Inlet sedimentary basin for the 12-month period ending on March 31, 2006, times (C) the average prevailing value for gas delivered in the Cook Inlet area for the 12-month period ending March 31, 2006, as determined by the department under AS

43.55.020(f)

.

For a calendar year, the tax levied by (e) of this section may not exceed one dollar a barrel of oil for oil produced from a lease or property in the Cook Inlet sedimentary basin.

[Repealed, § 66 ch 1 SSSLA 2007.]

[Repealed, § 33 ch. 4 4SSLA 2016.]

[Repealed, § 66 ch 1 SSSLA 2007.]

Notwithstanding other provisions of this section, for a calendar year, the tax levied under (e) of this section for each 1,000 cubic feet of gas for gas produced from a lease or property outside the Cook Inlet sedimentary basin and used in the state, other than gas subject to (p) of this section, may not exceed the amount of tax for each 1,000 cubic feet of gas that is determined under (j)(2) of this section.

For the seven years immediately following the commencement of commercial production of oil or gas produced from leases or properties in the state that are outside the Cook Inlet sedimentary basin and that do not include land located north of 68 degrees North latitude, where that commercial production began after December 31, 2012, and before January 1, 2027, the levy of tax under (e) of this section for oil and gas may not exceed four percent of the gross value at the point of production.

History.

(§ 1 ch 136 SLA 1977; am §§ 12, 18 ch 116 SLA 1981; am §§ 5, 34 ch 2 TSSLA 2006; am §§ 15 — 21, 66 ch 1 SSSLA 2007; am § 13 ch 16 SLA 2010; am §§ 10, 11 ch 51 SLA 2012; am §§ 4 — 8 ch 10 SLA 2013; am §§ 45, 46 ch 14 SLA 2014; am §§ 13 — 15, 33 ch 4 4SSLA 2016)

Cross references. —

For oil and gas leasing provisions, see AS

38.05.180

.

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 14, SLA 2014, which amended subsections (e) and (f), see 2014 Senate Journal 1423 — 1426.

Administrative Code. —

For gross value at the point of production of oil and gas, see 15 AAC 55, art. 1.

For production tax value of oil and gas, see 15 AAC 55, art. 2.

For tax credits, see 15 AAC 55, art. 3.

For levy of tax, see 15 AAC 55, art. 4.

For payments and reporting, see 15 AAC 55, art. 5.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, in (j), deleted “before 2022” preceding “, the tax levied by”; in (k), deleted “before 2022” preceding “, the tax levied by”, inserted “may not exceed one dollar a barrel of oil” preceding “for oil produced”; deleted “may not exceed” following “sedimentary basin”; deleted (k)(1) and (2); repealed (m); in (o), deleted “before 2022” preceding “, the tax levied”.

Editor’s notes. —

Sec. 35(a), ch. 10, SLA 2013 makes the 2013 amendment to (o) of this section applicable to oil and gas produced after December 31, 2012, and sec. 38, ch. 10, SLA 2013 makes that amendment retroactive to January 1, 2013.

Under sec. 35(b),
ch. 4, 4SSLA 2016, the 2016 amendment to subsection (k) “applies to oil produced after January 1, 2017.”

Sec. 43.55.012.
Adjustment in tax rates. [Repealed, § 34 ch 2 TSSLA 2006.]

Sec. 43.55.013.
Economic limit factor. [Repealed, § 34 ch 2 TSSLA 2006.]

Sec. 43.55.014.
Payment in gas of tax for gas.

For gas produced on and after January 1, 2022, other than gas described in (e) of this section, the department shall allow a producer to make an election, under regulations adopted by the department, to pay in gas the production tax levied by this section in lieu of the tax otherwise levied for the gas by AS

43.55.011(e)

. An election under this subsection applies only to gas produced from oil and gas leases modified under AS

38.05.180

(hh) from which the commissioner of natural resources has determined to take royalty gas in kind under AS

38.05.182

.

A production tax levied by this section is equal to 13 percent of the gas otherwise taxable under AS

43.55.011(e)(3)

produced from each oil and gas lease to which an effective election under (a) of this section applies, when and as that gas is produced. The producer shall pay the tax in gas by delivering that 13 percent of the gas to the state at the point of production.

The Department of Natural Resources shall manage under AS

38.05.020(b)(14)

the custody and disposition of gas delivered to the state under (b) of this section.

An assessment under AS

43.05.245

against a producer for an underpayment of a tax levied by this section may be made in terms of an amount of gas or an amount of money, as determined under regulations adopted by the department. If the assessment is made in terms of money, the amount for a month of production for an oil and gas lease subject to an effective election under (a) of this section is the product of the number of units of gas by which the producer’s delivery to the state was less than the amount required by (b) of this section, multiplied by the average gross value at the point of production for each unit of the gas produced by the producer from the lease during the month other than gas that was not subject to tax or gas that was delivered to the state under (b) of this section. The department may allow a credit or refund under AS

43.05.275

for an overpayment of a tax levied by this section that may be issued in the form of gas or money, as determined under regulations adopted by the department. If the credit or refund is allowed in terms of money, the amount of the credit or refund for a month of production for an oil and gas lease subject to an effective election under (a) of this section is the product of the number of units of gas by which the producer’s delivery to the state was more than the amount required under (b) of this section, multiplied by the average gross value at the point of production for each unit of the gas produced by the producer from the lease during the month other than gas that was not subject to tax or gas that was delivered to the state under (b) of this section. Interest that is determined as a percentage of the amount of a tax underpayment or overpayment and a penalty that is a percentage of the amount of a tax underpayment are calculated as a percentage of the amount of money determined in this subsection. An amount of gas that was less than the amount required to be delivered to the state under (b) of this section or an amount of gas that was more than the amount required to be delivered to the state under (b) of this section that is adjusted as provided by a gas balancing agreement to which the state is a party under AS

38.05.020(b)(11)

is not subject to assessment under AS

43.05.245

or a credit or refund under AS

43.05.275

. In this subsection, “unit” means a unit of measurement for gas identified by the department under regulations adopted by the department and may be expressed as 1,000 cubic feet, 1,000,000 British thermal units, or another appropriate unit of measurement specified by the department under regulations adopted by the department.

This section does not apply to gas that, under AS

43.55.020(e)

, is considered as gas produced from a lease or property for the purpose of AS

43.55.011

—

43.55.180

.

History.

(§ 47 ch 14 SLA 2014)

Cross references. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 14, SLA 2014, see 2014 Senate Journal 1423 — 1426.

Sec. 43.55.015.
Tax per barrel of oil.
[Repealed, § 9 ch 136 SLA 1977.]

Sec. 43.55.016.
Gas production tax. [Repealed, § 34 ch 2 TSSLA 2006.]

Sec. 43.55.017.
Relation to other taxes.

Except as provided in this chapter, the taxes imposed by this chapter are in place of all taxes now imposed by the state or any of its municipalities, and neither the state nor a municipality may impose a tax on

producing oil or gas leases;

oil or gas produced or extracted in the state;

the value of intangible drilling and development costs, as described in 26 U.S.C. 263(c) (Internal Revenue Code), as amended through January 1, 1974.

The taxes imposed by this chapter are in place of all taxes imposed by a municipality upon oil or gas in place or nonproducing oil or gas leases or properties.

The taxes imposed by this chapter are not in place of the tax imposed by income taxes, franchise taxes, or taxes upon the retail sale of oil or gas products.

History.

(§ 1 ch 136 SLA 1977; am § 36 ch 32 SLA 1997; am § 4 ch 34 SLA 1999; am § 6 ch 2 TSSLA 2006)

Opinions of attorney general. —

A municipality may not levy a transportation tax on crude oil flowing through the Trans Alaska Pipeline
while the crude oil passes through the municipality. November 15, 1989 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 43.55.018.
Credit against tax. [Repealed, § 18 ch 116 SLA 1981.]

Sec. 43.55.019.
Oil or gas producer education credit.

A producer of oil or gas is allowed a credit against the tax levied by AS

43.55.011(e)

for contributions of cash or equipment accepted for

direct instruction, research, and educational support purposes, including library and museum acquisitions, and contributions to endowment, by an Alaska university foundation or by a nonprofit, public or private, Alaska two-year or four-year college accredited by a national or regional accreditation association;

secondary school level vocational education courses, programs, and facilities by a school district in the state;

vocational education courses, programs, equipment, and facilities by a state-operated vocational technical education and training school, a nonprofit regional training center recognized by the Department of Labor and Workforce Development, and an apprenticeship program in the state that is registered with the United States Department of Labor under 29 U.S.C. 50 — 50b (National Apprenticeship Act);

a facility by a nonprofit, public or private, Alaska two-year or four-year college accredited by a national or regional accreditation association;

Alaska Native cultural or heritage programs and educational support, including mentoring and tutoring, provided by a nonprofit agency for public school staff and for students who are in grades kindergarten through 12 in the state;

education, research, rehabilitation, and facilities by an institution that is located in the state and that qualifies as a coastal ecosystem learning center under the Coastal America Partnership established by the federal government; and

the Alaska higher education investment fund under AS

37.14.750

.

The amount of the credit is 50 percent of contributions.

Each public college and university shall include in its annual operating budget request contributions received and how the contributions were used.

A contribution claimed as a credit under this section may not

be the basis for a credit claimed under another provision of this title; and

when combined with contributions that are the basis for credits taken during the taxpayer’s tax year under AS

21.96.070

, AS

43.20.014

, AS

43.56.018

, AS

43.65.018

, AS

43.75.018

, or AS

43.77.045

, result in the total amount of credits exceeding $1,000,000; if the taxpayer is a member of an affiliated group, then the total amount of credits may not exceed $1,000,000 for the affiliated group; in this paragraph, “affiliated group” has the meaning given in AS

43.20.145

.

The credit under this section may not reduce a person’s tax liability under AS

43.55.011(e)

to below zero for any tax year. An unused credit or portion of a credit not used under this section for a tax year may not be sold, traded, transferred, or applied in a subsequent tax year.

The department may, by regulation, establish procedures by which a taxpayer may allocate a pro rata share of a credit claimed under this section against monthly tax payments made during the tax year.

To qualify for a credit under this section, equipment must be appraised consistent with regulations adopted by the department to determine the value of the contribution for purposes of this section.

In this section,

“school district” has the meaning given in AS

43.20.014

;

“vocational education” has the meaning given in AS

43.20.014

.

History.

(§ 4 ch 58 SLA 1987; am § 49 ch 21 SLA 1991; am §§ 4, 5, 12 ch 71 SLA 1991; am § 5 ch 21 SLA 1994; am § 18 ch 126 SLA 1994; am § 17 ch 81 SLA 1996; am § 4 ch 86 SLA 2000; am §§ 10, 11 ch 46 SLA 2002; am § 3 ch 48 SLA 2008; am §§ 20, 22, 24, 26 ch 92 SLA 2010; am § 7 ch 7 FSSLA 2011; am § 8 ch 6 SLA 2012; am § 16 ch 74 SLA 2012; am §§ 48, 50 ch 14 SLA 2014; am § 1 ch 62 SLA 2018; am §§ 11 — 15 ch 101 SLA 2018)

Delayed repeal of section in 2025. —

Under secs. 21 and 37, ch. 61, SLA 2014, as amended by sec. 40, ch. 101, SLA 2018, this section is repealed January 1, 2025.

Revisor's notes. —

References to “ AS

43.55.011

—

43.55.150

” were substituted for “this chapter” in (a) of this section in 1989 to reflect the enactment of
AS

43.55.200

—

43.55.240

.

In 1991, to harmonize the amendments made by chs. 21 and 71, SLA 1991, the words “by an Alaska” were inserted before “university foundation” in (a) of this section.

In 2010, in (d)(2) of this section “AS

21.96.070

,

21.96.075

” was substituted for “AS 21.89.070,

21.89.075

” to reflect the 2010 renumbering of
AS 21.89.070 and

21.89.075

.

In 2012, in (d)(2) of this section, “ AS

43.20.145

” was substituted for “ AS

43.20.073

” to reflect the 2012 renumbering of
AS

43.20.073

.

In 2010 and 2018, this section was reorganized to conform to the style of the Alaska Statutes; subsection (e) was enacted as (f) in 2010 and subsection (g) was enacted as (h) in 2018.

In 2018, “AS

21.96.075

,” was deleted from paragraph (d)(2) to harmonize the repeal of AS

21.96.075

by sec. 1, ch. 62, SLA 2018, effective January 1, 2019, with the changes made by ch. 101, SLA 2018.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2008 amendment, effective January 1, 2009, rewrote the section.

The 2010 amendment, effective January 1, 2011, in (a)(1), added “, and facilities” following “programs”, in (a)(3), added “for vocational education courses, programs, and facilities” preceding “by a state-operated vocational”, added (a)(4), and made related changes; in (b)(2), substituted “$200,000” for “$100,000”, added (b)(3); in (d)(1), substituted “be the basis for a credit claimed” for “be claimed as a credit”, in (d)(2), added “contributions that are the basis for” following “when combined with”, substituted “result in the total amount of credits exceeding $5,000,000; if the taxpayer is a member of an affiliated group, then the total amount of credits may not exceed $5,000,000 for the affiliated group; in this paragraph, “affiliated group” has the meaning given in AS

43.20.073

” for “exceed $150,000”; added (e).

The 2011 amendment, effective July 23, 2011, inserted “or an annual intercollegiate sports tournament” in (a)(4), added (a)(5) and (a)(6), and made a related change.

The first 2012 amendment, effective March 24, 2012, in (g)(1) [now (h)(1)], substituted “AS

43.20.014

” for “AS

14.03.126

”.

The second 2012 amendment, effective September 14, 2012, added (a)(7), and made stylistic changes.

The 2014 amendment, effective May 9, 2014, in (a), in the introductory language, substituted “levied by AS

43.55.011(e)

” for “due under this chapter” following “against the tax”, and rewrote (a)(3), which read, “vocational education courses, programs, and facilities by a state-operated vocational technical education and training school”; in (e), substituted “AS

43.55.011(e)

” for “this chapter” following “tax liability under”.

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, in the introductory language in (a), substituted “contributions of cash or equipment” for “cash contributions”, in (a)(1), inserted “national or” preceding “regional accreditation”, in (a)(4), deleted “or an annual intercollegiate sports tournament” following “a facility” and inserted “national or” preceding “regional accreditation”; in (b)(2), substituted “75 percent” for “100 percent” at the beginning; in (d)(2), twice substituted “$1,000,000” for “$5,000,000”; added (h) [now (g)].

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2021, rewrote (b).